Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 657.462, as amended by section 1, chapter 76, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
657.462. (1)(a) The Director of the Employment Department or the director’s authorized repre-
sentative shall, for each calendar year,  compute a benefit ratio for each employer who meets the
requirements of this section.
(b)(A) For an employer whose  record has been chargeable with benefits throughout the 12 pre-
ceding calendar quarters ending on the computation  date, the benefit ratio shall be a quotient ob-
tained by dividing the total benefit charges to the employer’s record in the  12 calendar quarters by
the total of the employer’s taxable payrolls for the same 12 calendar quarters.
(B) For an employer whose record has been chargeable with benefits for at least four or more
consecutive calendar quarters but less than 12 consecutive calendar quarters and  ending on the
computation date, the benefit ratio shall be  the quotient obtained by dividing the total benefits
charged to the employer’s record for the consecutive calendar  quarters by the total of the
employer’s taxable payrolls for the same period.
(C) Benefit ratios shall be carried out to the sixth decimal place.
(2)(a) A list shall be prepared of all employers meeting the requirements of  this section whose
accounts  are  open according to Employment Department records as of August 31 following the
computation date.
(b) Employers shall be  listed in ascending order from the employer having the lowest benefit
ratio to the employer having the highest benefit ratio.
(c) The list shall show for each employer:
(A) The benefit ratio;
(B) The  employer’s taxable payroll for the four calendar quarters immediately preceding the
computation date; and
(C) A cumulative total consisting of the sum of the employer’s taxable payroll and the  taxable
payroll of all other preceding employers on the list.
(3)(a) The department shall group all employers in accordance with  the cumulative taxable
payroll percentage limits for the schedule in effect under Table A.
Enrolled Senate Bill 143 (SB 143-A) Page 1
(b)(A) All employers who fall within the same group shall be assigned the tax rate for  that
group.
(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of  this paragraph, if the grouping results in the taxable
payroll of an employer falling in two groups, the  employer and any other employer with the same
benefit ratio shall be assigned the lower of the two applicable rates.
(c) Fractions of a cent shall be dropped in computing taxable payroll limits used in Table A.
(d) The schedule in effect shall be in accordance with the Fund Adequacy Percentage Ratios  set
forth in Table A.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
TABLE A
(Taxable  Payroll  referred to is the total for all the eligible firms for the four calendar quarters
preceding and ending on the computation date)
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Fund Adequacy Percentage Ratio I
190% and Over
Tax Rate Cumulative Taxable Payroll Limits
(Percentage of Total Taxable Payroll)
0.5% 0.00% but less than 10.00%
0.6% 10.00% but less than 15.00%
0.7% 15.00% but less than 20.00%
0.8% 20.00% but less than 25.00%
0.9% 25.00% but less than 30.00%
1.0% 30.00% but less than 35.00%
1.1% 35.00% but less than 40.00%
1.2% 40.00% but less than 45.00%
1.3% 45.00% but less than 50.00%
1.4% 50.00% but less than 55.00%
1.5% 55.00% but less than 60.00%
1.6% 60.00% but less than 65.00%
1.7% 65.00% but less than 69.00%
1.8% 69.00% but less than 73.00%
1.9% 73.00% but less than 77.00%
2.0% 77.00% but less than 80.00%
2.1% 80.00% but less than 83.00%
2.2% 83.00% but less than 86.00%
2.3% 86.00% but less than 89.00%
2.4% 89.00% but less than 91.00%
2.5% 91.00% but less than 93.00%
2.6% 93.00% but less than 95.00%
2.7% 95.00% but less than 96.00%
2.8% 96.00% but less than 96.90%
2.9% 96.90% but less than 97.70%
3.0% 97.70% but less than 98.40%
3.1% 98.40% but less than 98.90%
3.2% 98.90% but less than 99.30%
3.4% 99.30% but less than 99.54%
3.6% 99.54% but less than 99.63%
3.8% 99.63% but less than 99.71%
4.0% 99.71% but less than 99.78%
Enrolled Senate Bill 143 (SB 143-A) Page 2
4.2% 99.78% but less than 99.84%
4.4% 99.84% but less than 99.89%
4.6% 99.89% but less than 99.93%
4.8% 99.93% but less than 99.96%
5.0% 99.96% but less than 99.98%
5.2% 99.98% but less than 99.99%
5.4% 99.99% to 100.00%
_______________________________________________________________________________________
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Fund Adequacy Percentage Ratio II
170.00% but less than 190%
Tax Rate Cumulative Taxable Payroll Limits
(Percentage of Total Taxable Payroll)
0.7% 0.00% but less than 10.00%
0.8% 10.00% but less than 15.00%
0.9% 15.00% but less than 20.00%
1.0% 20.00% but less than 25.00%
1.1% 25.00% but less than 30.00%
1.2% 30.00% but less than 35.00%
1.3% 35.00% but less than 40.00%
1.4% 40.00% but less than 44.00%
1.5% 44.00% but less than 48.00%
1.6% 48.00% but less than 52.00%
1.7% 52.00% but less than 56.00%
1.8% 56.00% but less than 60.00%
1.9% 60.00% but less than 64.00%
2.0% 64.00% but less than 68.00%
2.1% 68.00% but less than 72.00%
2.2% 72.00% but less than 76.00%
2.3% 76.00% but less than 79.00%
2.4% 79.00% but less than 82.00%
2.5% 82.00% but less than 85.00%
2.6% 85.00% but less than 88.00%
2.7% 88.00% but less than 90.00%
2.8% 90.00% but less than 92.00%
2.9% 92.00% but less than 93.50%
3.0% 93.50% but less than 94.90%
3.1% 94.90% but less than 96.20%
3.2% 96.20% but less than 97.40%
3.4% 97.40% but less than 98.54%
3.6% 98.54% but less than 99.54%
3.8% 99.54% but less than 99.63%
4.0% 99.63% but less than 99.71%
4.2% 99.71% but less than 99.78%
4.4% 99.78% but less than 99.84%
4.6% 99.84% but less than 99.89%
4.8% 99.89% but less than 99.93%
5.0% 99.93% but less than 99.96%
5.2% 99.96% but less than 99.98%
Enrolled Senate Bill 143 (SB 143-A) Page 3
5.4% 99.98% to 100.00%
_______________________________________________________________________________________
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Fund Adequacy Percentage Ratio III
145.00% but less than 170%
Tax Rate Cumulative Taxable Payroll Limits
(Percentage of Total Taxable Payroll)
0.9% 0.00% but less than 10.00%
1.0% 10.00% but less than 15.00%
1.1% 15.00% but less than 20.00%
1.2% 20.00% but less than 24.00%
1.3% 24.00% but less than 28.00%
1.4% 28.00% but less than 32.00%
1.5% 32.00% but less than 36.00%
1.6% 36.00% but less than 40.00%
1.7% 40.00% but less than 44.00%
1.8% 44.00% but less than 48.00%
1.9% 48.00% but less than 52.00%
2.0% 52.00% but less than 56.00%
2.1% 56.00% but less than 60.00%
2.2% 60.00% but less than 64.00%
2.3% 64.00% but less than 68.00%
2.4% 68.00% but less than 72.00%
2.5% 72.00% but less than 76.00%
2.6% 76.00% but less than 80.00%
2.7% 80.00% but less than 84.00%
2.8% 84.00% but less than 87.00%
2.9% 87.00% but less than 90.00%
3.0% 90.00% but less than 93.00%
3.1% 93.00% but less than 95.00%
3.2% 95.00% but less than 97.00%
3.4% 97.00% but less than 98.20%
3.6% 98.20% but less than 99.00%
3.8% 99.00% but less than 99.43%
4.0% 99.43% but less than 99.63%
4.2% 99.63% but less than 99.72%
4.4% 99.72% but less than 99.79%
4.6% 99.79% but less than 99.85%
4.8% 99.85% but less than 99.90%
5.0% 99.90% but less than 99.94%
5.2% 99.94% but less than 99.97%
5.4% 99.97% to 100.00%
_______________________________________________________________________________________
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Fund Adequacy Percentage Ratio IV
125.00% but less than 145%
Enrolled Senate Bill 143 (SB 143-A) Page 4
Tax Rate Cumulative Taxable Payroll Limits
(Percentage of Total Taxable Payroll)
1.2%  0.00% but less than 10.00%
1.3% 10.00% but less than 15.00%
1.4% 15.00% but less than 20.00%
1.5% 20.00% but less than 24.00%
1.6% 24.00% but less than 28.00%
1.7% 28.00% but less than 32.00%
1.8% 32.00% but less than 36.00%
1.9% 36.00% but less than 40.00%
2.0% 40.00% but less than 44.00%
2.1% 44.00% but less than 48.00%
2.2% 48.00% but less than 52.00%
2.3% 52.00% but less than 56.00%
2.4% 56.00% but less than 60.00%
2.5% 60.00% but less than 64.00%
2.6% 64.00% but less than 68.00%
2.7% 68.00% but less than 72.00%
2.8% 72.00% but less than 76.00%
2.9% 76.00% but less than 80.00%
3.0% 80.00% but less than 84.00%
3.1% 84.00% but less than 88.00%
3.2% 88.00% but less than 92.00%
3.3% 92.00% but less than 95.00%
3.4% 95.00% but less than 97.00%
3.6% 97.00% but less than 98.20%
3.8% 98.20% but less than 99.00%
4.0% 99.00% but less than 99.40%
4.2% 99.40% but less than 99.60%
4.4% 99.60% but less than 99.70%
4.6% 99.70% but less than 99.78%
4.8% 99.78% but less than 99.85%
5.0% 99.85% but less than 99.91%
5.2% 99.91% but less than 99.96%
5.4% 99.96% to 100.00%
_______________________________________________________________________________________
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Fund Adequacy Percentage Ratio V
110.00% but less than 125%
Tax Rate Cumulative Taxable Payroll Limits
(Percentage of Total Taxable Payroll)
1.5%  0.00% but less than 10.00%
1.6% 10.00% but less than 15.00%
1.7% 15.00% but less than 20.00%
1.8% 20.00% but less than 24.00%
1.9% 24.00% but less than 28.00%
2.0% 28.00% but less than 32.00%
2.1% 32.00% but less than 36.00%
2.2% 36.00% but less than 40.00%
Enrolled Senate Bill 143 (SB 143-A) Page 5
2.3% 40.00% but less than 44.00%
2.4% 44.00% but less than 48.00%
2.5% 48.00% but less than 52.00%
2.6% 52.00% but less than 56.00%
2.7% 56.00% but less than 60.00%
2.8% 60.00% but less than 64.00%
2.9% 64.00% but less than 68.00%
3.0% 68.00% but less than 72.00%
3.1% 72.00% but less than 76.00%
3.2% 76.00% but less than 80.00%
3.3% 80.00% but less than 84.00%
3.4% 84.00% but less than 88.00%
3.5% 88.00% but less than 92.00%
3.6% 92.00% but less than 95.00%
3.7% 95.00% but less than 97.00%
3.8% 97.00% but less than 98.20%
3.9% 98.20% but less than 99.00%
4.0% 99.00% but less than 99.40%
4.2% 99.40% but less than 99.60%
4.4% 99.60% but less than 99.70%
4.6% 99.70% but less than 99.78%
4.8% 99.78% but less than 99.85%
5.0% 99.85% but less than 99.91%
5.2% 99.91% but less than 99.96%
5.4% 99.96% to 100.00%
_______________________________________________________________________________________
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Fund Adequacy Percentage Ratio VI
100.00% but less than 110%
Tax Rate Cumulative Taxable Payroll Limits
(Percentage of Total Taxable Payroll)
1.8%  0.00% but less than 10.00%
1.9% 10.00% but less than 15.00%
2.0% 15.00% but less than 20.00%
2.1% 20.00% but less than 25.00%
2.2% 25.00% but less than 30.00%
2.3% 30.00% but less than 35.00%
2.4% 35.00% but less than 40.00%
2.5% 40.00% but less than 44.00%
2.6% 44.00% but less than 48.00%
2.7% 48.00% but less than 52.00%
2.8% 52.00% but less than 56.00%
2.9% 56.00% but less than 60.00%
3.0% 60.00% but less than 64.00%
3.1% 64.00% but less than 68.00%
3.2% 68.00% but less than 72.00%
3.3% 72.00% but less than 76.00%
3.4% 76.00% but less than 80.00%
3.5% 80.00% but less than 84.00%
Enrolled Senate Bill 143 (SB 143-A) Page 6
3.6% 84.00% but less than 88.00%
3.7% 88.00% but less than 92.00%
3.8% 92.00% but less than 95.00%
3.9% 95.00% but less than 97.00%
4.0% 97.00% but less than 98.20%
4.2% 98.20% but less than 99.00%
4.4% 99.00% but less than 99.50%
4.6% 99.50% but less than 99.70%
4.8% 99.70% but less than 99.79%
5.0% 99.79% but less than 99.87%
5.2% 99.87% but less than 99.94%
5.4% 99.94% to 100.00%
_______________________________________________________________________________________
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Fund Adequacy Percentage Ratio VII
90.00% but less than 100%
Tax Rate Cumulative Taxable Payroll Limits
(Percentage of Total Taxable Payroll)
2.0%  0.00% but less than 10.00%
2.1% 10.00% but less than 15.00%
2.2% 15.00% but less than 20.00%
2.3% 20.00% but less than 25.00%
2.4% 25.00% but less than 30.00%
2.5% 30.00% but less than 35.00%
2.6% 35.00% but less than 40.00%
2.7% 40.00% but less than 45.00%
2.8% 45.00% but less than 50.00%
2.9% 50.00% but less than 55.00%
3.0% 55.00% but less than 60.00%
3.1% 60.00% but less than 64.00%
3.2% 64.00% but less than 68.00%
3.3% 68.00% but less than 72.00%
3.4% 72.00% but less than 76.00%
3.5% 76.00% but less than 80.00%
3.6% 80.00% but less than 84.00%
3.7% 84.00% but less than 88.00%
3.8% 88.00% but less than 92.00%
3.9% 92.00% but less than 95.00%
4.0% 95.00% but less than 97.00%
4.2% 97.00% but less than 98.20%
4.4% 98.20% but less than 99.00%
4.6% 99.00% but less than 99.50%
4.8% 99.50% but less than 99.70%
5.0% 99.70% but less than 99.84%
5.2% 99.84% but less than 99.93%
5.4% 99.93% to 100.00%
_______________________________________________________________________________________
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Enrolled Senate Bill 143 (SB 143-A) Page 7
Fund Adequacy Percentage Ratio VIII
Under 90%
Tax Rate Cumulative Taxable Payroll Limits
(Percentage of Total Taxable Payroll)
2.2%  0.00% but less than 10.00%
2.3% 10.00% but less than 15.00%
2.4% 15.00% but less than 20.00%
2.5% 20.00% but less than 25.00%
2.6% 25.00% but less than 30.00%
2.7% 30.00% but less than 35.00%
2.8% 35.00% but less than 40.00%
2.9% 40.00% but less than 45.00%
3.0% 45.00% but less than 50.00%
3.1% 50.00% but less than 55.00%
3.2% 55.00% but less than 60.00%
3.3% 60.00% but less than 65.00%
3.4% 65.00% but less than 70.00%
3.5% 70.00% but less than 75.00%
3.6% 75.00% but less than 80.00%
3.7% 80.00% but less than 84.00%
3.8% 84.00% but less than 88.00%
3.9% 88.00% but less than 92.00%
4.0% 92.00% but less than 95.00%
4.2% 95.00% but less than 97.00%
4.4% 97.00% but less than 98.20%
4.6% 98.20% but less than 99.00%
4.8% 99.00% but less than 99.50%
5.0% 99.50% but less than 99.80%
5.2% 99.80% but less than 99.92%
5.4% 99.92% to 100.00%
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(4) Except as provided in subsection (6)(c) of this section:
(a) For each  calendar quarter, of each rate determined under Table A, one hundred and [ nine]
thirty-five one-thousandths of a percentage point of the rate shall be used to determine  an amount
of the wages subject to tax under this chapter  for that calendar quarter to be disposed of in ac-
cordance with this subsection.
(b) After withholding the actual shared  costs of the department in collecting the amount of
wages determined under paragraph (a)  of this subsection, the director or the director’s authorized
representative shall pay the amount of wages  into the Supplemental Employment Department Ad-
ministration Fund established under ORS 657.783.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (6)(c) of this section:
(a) For the first calendar quarter  of each odd-numbered year, in addition to the rate determined
under subsection  (4) of this section, of each rate determined under Table A, three one-hundredths
of a percentage  point of the rate shall be used to determine an amount of the wages subject to tax
under this chapter for that calendar quarter to be disposed of in accordance with this subsection.
(b) After withholding the actual shared costs of the department  in collecting the amount of
wages determined under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the director  or the director’s authorized
representative shall pay the amount of wages into the Wage Security Fund established under  ORS
652.409.
Enrolled Senate Bill 143 (SB 143-A) Page 8
(c) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this  section, moneys due pursuant to this section but
not received by the department for payment to the Wage Security Fund  by June 30 of each odd-
numbered year shall be paid into the Unemployment Compensation Trust Fund created under ORS
657.805.
(6)(a) All amounts of wages determined  for disposition under subsections (4) and (5) of this sec-
tion shall be paid and collected in the same manner and at the same time as unemployment com-
pensation taxes under this chapter, unless the director prescribes otherwise.
(b) In no case shall the rates imposed on wages under subsections (4) and (5) of  this section
cause the total rate imposed on the wages under this section to exceed the rate determined under
Table A for any employer.
(c) Subsections (4) and (5) of this section do not apply to  the wages of employers whose assigned
tax rate is 5.4 percent.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 657.783, as amended by section 3, chapter 76, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
657.783. (1) There is established in the  State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General
Fund, the Supplemental Employment Department Administration Fund. The Supplemental Employ-
ment Department Administration Fund  shall consist of moneys collected or received by the Em-
ployment Department pursuant to ORS 657.462.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3)  of this section, all income earned on moneys in the
Supplemental Employment Department Administration Fund invested by  the State Treasurer shall
accrue to the fund. Any balance in the fund shall not lapse at any time. All moneys in the fund are
continuously appropriated [ continuously] to the department for the payment of expenses  of admin-
istration of this  chapter for which federal funding has been reduced, eliminated or otherwise is not
available, and which has been authorized in the legislatively approved budget of the department.
(3)(a) As used in this subsection, “budgeted moneys” means the total  amount of limited
funds authorized for expenditure by the Employment Department under the legislatively ap-
proved budget, as defined in ORS 291.002, for a biennium ending on June 30  of an odd-
numbered year, excluding any  amounts budgeted for the Office of Administrative Hearings
and the family and medical leave insurance program.
(b) As determined on June 30 of each odd-numbered year, moneys in  the Supplemental Employ-
ment Department Administration Fund  that are in excess of [ 150 percent of the amount collected
pursuant to ORS 657.462 (4) for the first quarter of the previous even-numbered  year ] one-eighth of
the budgeted moneys  shall be transferred to the Unemployment Compensation Trust Fund.
(c) The transfer required by this subsection  shall be made by December 31 of the odd-numbered
year.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 657.462  by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to cal-
endar quarters beginning on or after April 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. The amendments to ORS 657.783 by section 2 of this 2025 Act  apply to
transfers made to the Unemployment  Compensation Trust Fund for biennia ending on or
after June 30, 2025.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 143 (SB 143-A) Page 9
Passed by Senate May 29, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 143 (SB 143-A) Page 10